Utah statutes.
53A-17a-123.   Local Discretionary Block Grant Program -- State contribution.

(1)  The State Board of Education shall distribute money appropriated for the Local Discretionary Block Grant Program to school districts and charter schools according to a formula adopted by the board, after consultation with school districts and charter schools, that allocates the funding in a fair and equitable manner.

(2)  Schools districts and charter schools shall use Local Discretionary Block Grant monies for:

(a)  maintenance and operation costs;

(b)  capital outlay; or

(c)  debt service.

